Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-173
Offstreet parking; supplementary powers.

Sections 17-163 to 17-173 are supplementary to existing statutes relating to cities of the second class and confer upon such cities powers not heretofore granted.

Laws 1957, c. 29, § 11, p. 189.